src/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON adjectives
авторитетной:авторитетной A_  "" ;
агропромышленной:агропромышленной A_  "" ;
адӟыса% тыронтэм:адӟыса% тыронтэм A_  "" ;
азран:азран A_  "" ;
азьпал:азьпал A_  "" ;
акварель:акварель A_  "" ;
акыр:акыр A_  "" ;
алышной:алышной A_  "" ;
анайтэм% но% атайтэм:анайтэм% но% атайтэм A_  "" ;
антифашистской:антифашистской A_  "" ;
аргиллит:аргиллит A_  "" ;
артельной:артельной A_  "" ;
ас% мурто:ас% мурто A_  "" ;
атаман:атаман A_  "" ;
багалма:багалма A_  "" ;
байдыс:байдыс A_  "" ;
балкон:балкон A_  "" ;
басыл:басыл A_  "" ;
бездыт:бездыт A_  "" ;
бельтэк:бельтэк A_  "" ;
берлоез:берлоез A_  "" ;
бесхозяйственной:бесхозяйственной A_  "" ;
благородной:благородной A_  "" ;
бороздаё:бороздаё A_  "" ;
будос:будос A_  "" ;
бурлат:бурлат A_  "" ;
бухгалтерской:бухгалтерской A_  "" ;
быжъем:быжъем A_  "" ;
бӧляк:бӧляк A_  "" ;
вакчи:вакчи A_  "" ;
валтэм:валтэм A_  "" ;
варсь:варсь A_  "" ;
вельвет:вельвет A_  "" ;
веськыт:веськыт A_  "" ;
вимо:вимо A_  "" ;
висо-вожо:висо-вожо A_  "" ;
внештатной:внештатной A_  "" ;
вож:вож A_  "" ;
возьыны% луонтэм:возьыны% луонтэм A_  "" ;
вооружённой:вооружённой A_  "" ;
воспитательной:воспитательной A_  "" ;
второстепенной:второстепенной A_  "" ;
вуоноез:вуоноез A_  "" ;
вылӥ% но% шор% рад% вискысь:вылӥ% но% шор% рад% вискысь A_  "" ;
вӧесь:вӧесь A_  "" ;
газированной:газированной A_  "" ;
гаӵко:гаӵко A_  "" ;
гердо-гердо:гердо-гердо A_  "" ;
гидрологи:гидрологи A_  "" ;
глухой:глухой A_  "" ;
гондыро:гондыро A_  "" ;
гордгалэс:гордгалэс A_  "" ;
грабен:грабен A_  "" ;
гроб:гроб A_  "" ;
гуманной:гуманной A_  "" ;
гуруло:гуруло A_  "" ;
гырко:гырко A_  "" ;
дары:дары A_  "" ;
декабрьской:декабрьской A_  "" ;
детекторной:детекторной A_  "" ;
доблестной:доблестной A_  "" ;
донгыз:донгыз A_  "" ;
дунгыс:дунгыс A_  "" ;
духовной:духовной A_  "" ;
дышмем:дышмем A_  "" ;
дӥнё-йылсо:дӥнё-йылсо A_  "" ;
егитъем:егитъем A_  "" ;
жаг:жаг A_  "" ;
женьшень:женьшень A_  "" ;
жонгрес:жонгрес A_  "" ;
зависимой:зависимой A_  "" ;
замша:замша A_  "" ;
зарядо:зарядо A_  "" ;
зодиак:зодиак A_  "" ;
зугрес:зугрес A_  "" ;
зэмутись:зэмутись A_  "" ;
идейной:идейной A_  "" ;
изъяно:изъяно A_  "" ;
инженерно-технической:инженерно-технической A_  "" ;
иранской:иранской A_  "" ;
итоговой:итоговой A_  "" ;
йыло-дӥнё:йыло-дӥнё A_  "" ;
йырполэс:йырполэс A_  "" ;
йӧн:йӧн A_  "" ;
кавалеристской:кавалеристской A_  "" ;
кайла:кайла A_  "" ;
калшам:калшам A_  "" ;
кантар:кантар A_  "" ;
карак:карак A_  "" ;
кардиологической:кардиологической A_  "" ;
картон:картон A_  "" ;
катьтэм-витэм:катьтэм-витэм A_  "" ;
кебит:кебит A_  "" ;
кембрий:кембрий A_  "" ;
кенэмо:кенэмо A_  "" ;
кесэго:кесэго A_  "" ;
кибашо:кибашо A_  "" ;
кильтрес:кильтрес A_  "" ;
кисыр:кисыр A_  "" ;
классной:классной A_  "" ;
кожой:кожой A_  "" ;
колёс:колёс A_  "" ;
комнатаё:комнатаё A_  "" ;
конкретной:конкретной A_  "" ;
конь-конь:конь-конь A_  "" ;
коробо:коробо A_  "" ;
котыресо:котыресо A_  "" ;
кресловина:кресловина A_  "" ;
куалектыл:куалектыл A_  "" ;
куатали:куатали A_  "" ;
кузесь:кузесь A_  "" ;
кузьыт:кузьыт A_  "" ;
куко:куко A_  "" ;
кулэ:кулэ A_  "" ;
кунпус:кунпус A_  "" ;
курень:курень A_  "" ;
курыт:курыт A_  "" ;
куӵо-каӵо:куӵо-каӵо A_  "" ;
кык% пыдо:кык% пыдо A_  "" ;
кылрадо:кылрадо A_  "" ;
кын:кын A_  "" ;
кырыж:кырыж A_  "" ;
кӧбертэм:кӧбертэм A_  "" ;
кӧсыт% ымныро:кӧсыт% ымныро A_  "" ;
кӧӵ:кӧӵ A_  "" ;
лайыго:лайыго A_  "" ;
лапшо:лапшо A_  "" ;
легезь:легезь A_  "" ;
леленчи:леленчи A_  "" ;
лесопильной:лесопильной A_  "" ;
лимонной:лимонной A_  "" ;
лиё:лиё A_  "" ;
луло:луло A_  "" ;
лушкем:лушкем A_  "" ;
лызалэс-чагыр:лызалэс-чагыр A_  "" ;
лыэсь:лыэсь A_  "" ;
лэйкыт:лэйкыт A_  "" ;
ляк% голькыт:ляк% голькыт A_  "" ;
магической:магической A_  "" ;
макетной:макетной A_  "" ;
мандарин:мандарин A_  "" ;
март:март A_  "" ;
матросской:матросской A_  "" ;
межпланетной:межпланетной A_  "" ;
мерлыко:мерлыко A_  "" ;
мещанской:мещанской A_  "" ;
минералогической:минералогической A_  "" ;
могдос:могдос A_  "" ;
монгол:монгол A_  "" ;
моторной:моторной A_  "" ;
музей:музей A_  "" ;
мундэс:мундэс A_  "" ;
муӵо:муӵо A_  "" ;
мылкыдъемесь:мылкыдъемесь A_  "" ;
мятной:мятной A_  "" ;
накас:накас A_  "" ;
напгем:напгем A_  "" ;
натуральной:натуральной A_  "" ;
начар:начар A_  "" ;
нейтральной:нейтральной A_  "" ;
неудовлетворительной:неудовлетворительной A_  "" ;
нинег:нинег A_  "" ;
нокуд:нокуд A_  "" ;
нумыресь:нумыресь A_  "" ;
нылкышномурт:нылкышномурт A_  "" ;
ныртка:ныртка A_  "" ;
нюжаё-нюжаё:нюжаё-нюжаё A_  "" ;
нюр:нюр A_  "" ;
няськатэм:няськатэм A_  "" ;
областной:областной A_  "" ;
общезаводской:общезаводской A_  "" ;
объединённой:объединённой A_  "" ;
огкадь:огкадь A_  "" ;
ограниченной:ограниченной A_  "" ;
одӥг% турлы:одӥг% турлы A_  "" ;
олень:олень A_  "" ;
определённо-личной:определённо-личной A_  "" ;
орденской:орденской A_  "" ;
отборной:отборной A_  "" ;
отрядной:отрядной A_  "" ;
ош:ош A_  "" ;
падко:падко A_  "" ;
палдурес:палдурес A_  "" ;
палэзьпу:палэзьпу A_  "" ;
парламентской:парламентской A_  "" ;
пась:пась A_  "" ;
пегой:пегой A_  "" ;
пенсионной:пенсионной A_  "" ;
переговорной:переговорной A_  "" ;
персидской:персидской A_  "" ;
пилотируемой:пилотируемой A_  "" ;
пиоспинал:пиоспинал A_  "" ;
пиякыӵ:пиякыӵ A_  "" ;
плис:плис A_  "" ;
подпольной:подпольной A_  "" ;
позывной:позывной A_  "" ;
политической:политической A_  "" ;
пор:пор A_  "" ;
потомственной:потомственной A_  "" ;
превосходной:превосходной A_  "" ;
прибылё:прибылё A_  "" ;
приходо-расходной:приходо-расходной A_  "" ;
проездной:проездной A_  "" ;
простой:простой A_  "" ;
пружинной:пружинной A_  "" ;
пузыриё:пузыриё A_  "" ;
пуньырес:пуньырес A_  "" ;
пуховой:пуховой A_  "" ;
пыдо:пыдо A_  "" ;
пыльккос:пыльккос A_  "" ;
пӧлыё:пӧлыё A_  "" ;
равноправной:равноправной A_  "" ;
районо:районо A_  "" ;
ревизионистской:ревизионистской A_  "" ;
ремесленной:ремесленной A_  "" ;
рис:рис A_  "" ;
ружейной:ружейной A_  "" ;
садо:садо A_  "" ;
салдат:салдат A_  "" ;
санитарной:санитарной A_  "" ;
сахарин:сахарин A_  "" ;
секретной:секретной A_  "" ;
серб:серб A_  "" ;
силё-сюрно:силё-сюрно A_  "" ;
синъем:синъем A_  "" ;
скульлтурной:скульлтурной A_  "" ;
сложноподчиненной:сложноподчиненной A_  "" ;
согласной:согласной A_  "" ;
спай:спай A_  "" ;
стехиометриятэм:стехиометриятэм A_  "" ;
сузытэм:сузытэм A_  "" ;
сур:сур A_  "" ;
сынэм:сынэм A_  "" ;
сьӧдпыр:сьӧдпыр A_  "" ;
сэпо:сэпо A_  "" ;
сюо:сюо A_  "" ;
сямтэм:сямтэм A_  "" ;
сӥялэс:сӥялэс A_  "" ;
такъяё:такъяё A_  "" ;
татысь:татысь A_  "" ;
тепловой:тепловой A_  "" ;
типографической:типографической A_  "" ;
толло:толло A_  "" ;
топографи:топографи A_  "" ;
транспортной:транспортной A_  "" ;
туала:туала A_  "" ;
тульырес:тульырес A_  "" ;
туристской:туристской A_  "" ;
тушо:тушо A_  "" ;
тыпы:тыпы A_  "" ;
тырттэм:тырттэм A_  "" ;
тэскары:тэскары A_  "" ;
тӧдьпыръем:тӧдьпыръем A_  "" ;
тӧло:тӧло A_  "" ;
ужо:ужо A_  "" ;
уй:уй A_  "" ;
уло:уло A_  "" ;
улэсь:улэсь A_  "" ;
умтэм:умтэм A_  "" ;
условной:условной A_  "" ;
уёу:уёу A_  "" ;
фаршировать% карем:фаршировать% карем A_  "" ;
фигурной:фигурной A_  "" ;
финн:финн A_  "" ;
форменной:форменной A_  "" ;
футбольной:футбольной A_  "" ;
хищной:хищной A_  "" ;
хромовой:хромовой A_  "" ;
цеховой:цеховой A_  "" ;
чай:чай A_  "" ;
чарпут:чарпут A_  "" ;
червонной:червонной A_  "" ;
честной:честной A_  "" ;
чиед:чиед A_  "" ;
чияпу:чияпу A_  "" ;
чуко:чуко A_  "" ;
чутыри:чутыри A_  "" ;
шайтан% кутэм:шайтан% кутэм A_  "" ;
шальтырес:шальтырес A_  "" ;
шеко:шеко A_  "" ;
шимес:шимес A_  "" ;
шоретӥез:шоретӥез A_  "" ;
шу:шу A_  "" ;
шукышо:шукышо A_  "" ;
шупыт:шупыт A_  "" ;
шыр:шыр A_  "" ;
шӧртчи:шӧртчи A_  "" ;
ымо:ымо A_  "" ;
эбылес:эбылес A_  "" ;
эзель:эзель A_  "" ;
экспортной:экспортной A_  "" ;
элементной:элементной A_  "" ;
энгек:энгек A_  "" ;
этюдной:этюдной A_  "" ;
юнлыко:юнлыко A_  "" ;
якут:якут A_  "" ;
ярлы:ярлы A_  "" ;
ӝикыт:ӝикыт A_  "" ;
ӝушо:ӝушо A_  "" ;
ӟечлыко:ӟечлыко A_  "" ;
ӟырдыт:ӟырдыт A_  "" ;
ӵуж% йыро:ӵуж% йыро A_  "" ;
ӵынэсь:ӵынэсь A_  "" ;
